Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-270, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-270. A. As funding permits, the State Department of
Health shall foster and coordinate implementation of a plan for a
statewide coordinated system of care for stroke, which shall include
special focus and attention on evidence-based treatment for stroke.
Such system shall include, but shall not be limited to:
1. Recommendations from the Oklahoma Hospital Advisory Council
and medical experts in stroke care;
2. Collaboration and partnerships with relevant professional
organizations and associations advocating for evidence-based
treatment for stroke patients;
3. Measures to raise awareness and promote preventative medical
care regarding risk factors for stroke;

4. Utilization of state-recognized stroke hospital
classifications; and
5. Protocols for evidence-based pre-hospital and interfacility
assessment, treatment, and transport of stroke patients by emergency
medical responders and agencies licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma
Emergency Response Systems Development Act.
B. The State Board Commissioner of Health may promulgate rules
as necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-705, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-705. A. The State Board of Health, upon
recommendation of the State Commissioner of Health and with the
advice of the Oklahoma Hospital Advisory Council hereinafter
provided for, shall promulgate rules and standards for the
construction and operation of hospitals, for which licenses are
required by the terms of this article, to provide for the proper
care of patients. The promulgation of rules shall be subject to and
be governed by the provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act.
B. Every hospital shall be periodically inspected by an
authorized representative of the Commissioner. Reports of such
inspections shall be on forms prescribed by the Commissioner, who
shall, after receipt of such reports, take such action as deemed
necessary by the Commission Commissioner to have corrected any
deficiencies or violations of the rules and standards of the Board
Commissioner shown in such reports.
C. Hospitals licensed pursuant to the provisions of this
article shall not be exempt from being inspected or licensed under
laws relating to hotels, restaurants, lodging houses, boarding
houses boardinghouses and places of refreshment.
D. 1. Every hospital that offers or provides inpatient
psychiatric or chemical dependency treatment services to persons
eighteen (18) years of age or younger shall offer, provide or
otherwise make available community-based programs and services and
may make such programs and services available directly, through
ENR. S. B. NO. 1423 Page 2

contract, or other appropriate means as determined by the State
Department of Health.
2. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “community-
based services” shall have the same meaning as such term is defined
by Section 1-1-105 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-707, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-707. A. The State Commissioner of Health, with the
advice of the Oklahoma Hospital Advisory Council, shall promulgate
rules and standards as the Commissioner deems to be in the public
interest for hospitals, on the following:
1. Construction plans and location, including fees not to
exceed Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for submission or
resubmission of architectural and building plans, and procedures to
ensure the timely review of such plans by the State Department of
Health. The assessed fee shall be used solely for the purposes of
processing approval of construction plans and location by the State
Department of Health;
2. Physical plant and facilities;
3. Fire protection and safety;
4. Food service;
5. Reports and records;
6. Staffing and personal service;
7. Surgical facilities and equipment;
8. Maternity facilities and equipment;
9. Control of communicable disease;
10. Sanitation;
11. Laboratory services;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1423 Page 3

12. Nursing facilities and equipment; and
13. Other items as may be deemed necessary to carry out the
purposes of this article.
B. 1. The State Commissioner of Health, with the advice of the
Oklahoma Hospital Advisory Council and the State Board of Pharmacy,
shall promulgate rules and standards as the Commissioner deems to be
in the public interest with respect to the storage and dispensing of
drugs and medications for hospital patients.
2. The State Board of Pharmacy shall be empowered to inspect
drug facilities in licensed hospitals and shall report violations of
applicable statutes and rules to the State Department of Health for
action and reply.
C. 1. The Commissioner shall appoint an Oklahoma Hospital
Advisory Council to advise the Department regarding hospital
operations and to recommend actions to improve patient care.
2. The Advisory Council shall have the duty and authority to:
a. review and approve in its advisory capacity rules and
standards for hospital licensure,
b. evaluate, review and make recommendations regarding
Department licensure activities; provided however, the
Advisory Council shall not make recommendations
regarding scope of practice for any health care
providers or practitioners regulated pursuant to Title
59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and
c. recommend and approve:
(1) quality indicators and data submission
requirements for hospitals, and
(2) the indicators and data to be used by the
Department to monitor compliance with licensure
requirements.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1423 Page 4

D. 1. The Advisory Council shall be composed of nine (9)
members appointed by the Commissioner. The membership of the
Advisory Council shall be as follows:
a. two members shall be hospital administrators of
licensed hospitals,
b. two members shall be licensed physicians or
practitioners who have current privileges to provide
services in hospitals,
c. two members shall be hospital employees, and
d. three members shall be citizens representing the
public who:
(1) are not hospital employees,
(2) do not hold hospital staff appointments, and
(3) are not members of hospital governing boards.
2. a. Advisory Council members shall be appointed for three-
year terms except the initial terms after November 1,
1999, of one hospital administrator, one licensed
physician or practitioner, one hospital employee, and
one public member shall be one (1) year. The initial
terms after the effective date of this act of one
hospital administrator, one licensed physician or
practitioner, one hospital employee, and one public
member shall be two (2) years. The initial terms of
all other members shall be three (3) years. After
initial appointments to the Council, members shall be
appointed to three-year terms.
b. Members of the Advisory Council may be removed by the
Commissioner for cause.
E. The Advisory Council shall meet on a quarterly basis and
shall annually elect from among its members a chairperson. Members
of the Council shall serve without compensation but shall be
ENR. S. B. NO. 1423 Page 5

reimbursed by the Department for travel expenses related to their
service as authorized by the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1423 Page 6

Passed the Senate the 9th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1423 Page 7